Washington statutes.
RCW 36.28.120

Duty of retiring sheriffs, constables, and coroners—Successors' duties.

All sheriffs, constables and coroners, upon the completion of their term of office and the qualification of their successors, shall deliver and turn over to their successors all writs and other processes in their possession not wholly executed, and all personal property in their possession or under their control held under such writs or processes, and take receipts therefor in duplicate, one of which shall be filed in the office from which such writ or process issued as a paper in the action, which receipt shall be good and sufficient discharge to such officer of and from further charge of the execution of such writs and processes; and they shall also deliver to their successors all official papers and property in their possession or under their control. The successors shall execute or complete the execution of all such writs and processes, and finish and complete all business turned over to them.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.28.120. Prior: 1895 c 17 s 1; RRS s 4174.]